New York, session 2025-2026, S8949.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 37 2 to read as follows: 3 § 37. Audit and review of medical assistance program funds. Where the 4 inspector determines an overpayment of funds has occurred due to a 5 provider's submission of supporting records in a form, format, or method 6 of transmission that is not in accordance with program requirements in 7 effect at the time of the claim, but, due to intervening changes to 8 program requirements, including changes to state agency guidelines, 9 regulations, or other guidance, is in accordance with the requirements 10 in effect at the time of the inspector's review or determination or any 11 administrative reviews and other court proceedings related to the 12 inspector's review or determination, then, in the absence of fraud or 13 evidence the provider received reimbursement for items or services that 14 were not provided to the beneficiary, or the beneficiary was not eligi- 15 ble for the items or services, recoupment for such claim disallowances 16 shall be limited to the reimbursement amount of the claims actually 17 reviewed by the inspector without extrapolation, and the inspector shall 18 not initiate new or additional reviews against the provider on the same 19 basis. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to audits 21 commenced on or after such effective date, audits pending as of such 22 date, and audits that the Medicaid inspector general has concluded but 23 which are under administrative review or other properly filed judicial 24 review or appeal. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14172-01-5